Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-923
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Negotiated Rulemaking Act:

(1) Agency shall have the same meaning as in section 84-901;

(2) Consensus shall mean unanimous concurrence among the interests represented on a negotiated rulemaking committee unless the committee agrees upon another specified definition;

(3) Convenor shall mean a person who impartially assists an agency in determining whether establishment of a negotiated rulemaking committee is feasible and appropriate for a particular rulemaking procedure;

(4) Facilitator shall mean a person who impartially aids in the discussions and negotiations among the members of a negotiated rulemaking committee to develop a proposed rule. A facilitator shall not have decisionmaking authority;

(5) Interest shall mean, with respect to an issue or matter, multiple parties that have a similar point of view or that are likely to be affected in a similar manner;

(6) Negotiated rulemaking shall mean rulemaking through the use of a negotiated rulemaking committee;

(7) Negotiated rulemaking committee or committee shall mean an advisory committee established to consider and discuss issues for the purpose of reaching a consensus in the development of a proposed rule;

(8) Person shall mean an individual, partnership, limited liability company, corporation, association, governmental subdivision, agency, or public or private organization of any character; and

(9) Rule shall mean rule or regulation as defined in section 84-901.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 3.